Florida, session 2026, HB1141.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
28
29 Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 11.242, Florida
30 Statutes, is amended to read:
31 11.242 Powers, duties, and functions as to statutory
32 revision.—The powers, duties, and functions of the Office of
33 Legislative Services in the operation and maintenance of a
34 statutory revision program shall be as follows:
35 (1) To conduct a systematic and continuing study of the
36 statutes and laws of this state for the purpose of reducing
37 their number and bulk;, removing inconsistencies, redundancies,
38 and unnecessary repetitions and otherwise improving their
39 clarity and facilitating their correct and proper
40 interpretation; and ensuring that military compatibility is
41 examined as provided in s. 163.3175; and for the same purpose,
42 to prepare and submit to the Legislature reviser's bills and
43 bills for the amendment, consolidation, revision, repeal, or
44 other alterations or changes in any general statute or laws or
45 parts thereof of a general nature and application of the
46 preceding session or sessions which may appear to be subject to
47 revision. Any revision, either complete, partial, or topical,
48 prepared for submission to the Legislature shall be accompanied
49 by revision and history notes relating to the same, showing the
50 changes made therein and the reason for such recommended change.
Page 2 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1141-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1141 2026
51 Section 2. Section 163.3175, Florida Statutes, is amended
52 to read:
53 163.3175 Legislative findings on compatibility of
54 development with military installations and ranges; exchange of
55 information between local governments and military installations
56 and ranges.—
57 (1) The Legislature finds that incompatible development on
58 of land and in state-controlled waters or on state submerged
59 lands close to military installations and ranges can adversely
60 affect the ability of such an installation or range to carry out
61 its mission. The Legislature further finds that such development
62 also threatens the public safety because of the possibility of
63 accidents occurring within the areas surrounding a military
64 installation or range. In addition, the economic vitality of a
65 community is affected when military operations and missions must
66 relocate because of incompatible urban encroachment. Therefore,
67 the Legislature finds that effective coordination among it
68 desirable for the local governments, state departments, the
69 state land planning agency, and military installations and
70 ranges is desirable in the state to cooperate with military
71 installations to encourage compatible land use and activities in
72 state-controlled waters or on state submerged lands to, help
73 prevent incompatible encroachment, and facilitate the continued
74 presence of major military installations and ranges in this
75 state.
Page 3 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1141-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1141 2026
76 (2) Certain major military installations and ranges, due
77 to their mission and activities, have a greater potential for
78 experiencing compatibility and coordination issues than others.
79 Consequently, this section and s. 163.3177(6)(a), relating to
80 compatibility of land development with military installations
81 and ranges, apply to specific affected local governments in
82 proximity to and in association with specific military
83 installations and ranges, as follows:
84 (a) Avon Park Air Force Range, associated with Highlands,
85 Okeechobee, Osceola, and Polk Counties and Avon Park, Sebring,
86 and Frostproof.
87 (b) Camp Blanding, associated with Clay, Bradford, and
88 Putnam Counties.
89 (c) Eglin Air Force Base and Hurlburt Field, associated
90 with Gulf, Okaloosa, Santa Rosa, and Walton Counties and Cinco
91 Bayou, Crestview, Destin, DeFuniak Springs, Fort Walton Beach,
92 Freeport, Laurel Hill, Mary Esther, Niceville, Shalimar, and
93 Valparaiso.
94 (d) Homestead Air Reserve Base, associated with Miami-Dade
95 County and Homestead.
96 (e) Jacksonville Training Range Complex, associated with
97 Lake, Marion, Putnam, and Volusia Counties.
98 (f) MacDill Air Force Base, associated with Hillsborough
99 County and Tampa.
100 (g) Naval Air Station Jacksonville, Marine Corps Support
Page 4 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1141-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1141 2026
101 Facility-Blount Island, and outlying landing field Whitehouse,
102 and the Florida Air National Guard, associated with Duval
103 County, Jacksonville Port Authority, and Jacksonville.
104 (h) Naval Air Station Key West, including various annexes
105 across Boca Chica Key and Key West as well as the Fleming
106 Bay/Patton Water Drop Zone training range used by the Army
107 Special Forces Underwater Operations School, associated with
108 Monroe County and Key West.
109 (i) Naval Support Activity Orlando, including Bugg Spring
110 and Naval Ordnance Test Unit, associated with Orange, Brevard,
111 and Lake Counties, County and Orlando, Canaveral Port Authority,
112 and Okahumpka.
113 (j) Naval Support Activity Panama City, associated with
114 Bay County, Panama City, and Panama City Beach.
115 (k) Naval Air Station Pensacola, associated with Escambia
116 County.
117 (l) Naval Air Station Whiting Field and its outlying
118 landing fields, associated with Santa Rosa and Escambia
119 Counties.
120 (m) Naval Station Mayport, associated with Duval County,
121 Atlantic Beach, and Jacksonville.
122 (n) Patrick Space Force Base and Cape Canaveral Space
123 Force Station, associated with Brevard County, Canaveral Port
124 Authority, and Satellite Beach.
125 (o) Tyndall Air Force Base, associated with Bay County,
Page 5 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1141-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1141 2026
126 and Mexico Beach, and Parker.
127 (p) United States Southern Command, associated with Miami-
128 Dade County and Doral.
129 (q) South Florida Ocean Measurement Facility, associated
130 with Broward County and Dania Beach.
131 (r) United States Coast Guard Sector Jacksonville,
132 including Station Mayport, Station Port Canaveral, Station Ponce
133 de Leon Inlet, Aids to Navigation Team Jacksonville Beach, and
134 Helicopter Interdiction Tactical Squadron (HITRON), associated
135 with Duval, Brevard, and Volusia Counties and Jacksonville,
136 Jacksonville Beach, Atlantic Beach, Canaveral Port Authority,
137 and New Smyrna Beach.
138 (s) United States Coast Guard Sector Miami, including Base
139 Miami Beach, Station Fort Lauderdale, Station Fort Pierce, Air
140 Station Miami, Station Lake Worth Inlet, and Civil Engineering
141 Unit Miami, associated with St. Lucie, Palm Beach, Broward, and
142 Miami-Dade Counties and Fort Pierce, Riviera Beach, Dania Beach,
143 Opa-locka, Miami, and Miami Beach.
144 (t) United States Coast Guard Sector Key West, including
145 Station Key West, Station Islamorada, and Station Marathon,
146 associated with Monroe County and Key West, Islamorada, and
147 Marathon.
148 (u) United States Coast Guard Sector St. Petersburg,
149 including Station St. Petersburg, Air Station Clearwater,
150 Station Cortez, Station Fort Myers Beach, Station Sand Key, and
Page 6 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1141-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1141 2026
151 Station Yankeetown, associated with Pinellas, Manatee, Lee, and
152 Levy Counties and St. Petersburg, Clearwater, Cortez, Fort Myers
153 Beach, and Yankeetown.
154 (v) United States Coast Guard Sector Mobile, including
155 Station Panama City, Station Destin, and Station Pensacola,
156 associated with Bay, Okaloosa, and Escambia Counties and Panama
157 City, Destin, and Pensacola.
158 (3) The direct-support organization created in s. 288.987
159 may recommend to the Legislature changes to the military
160 installations and ranges and local governments specified in
161 subsection (2) based on a military base or range's base's
162 potential for impacts from encroachment, and incompatible land
163 uses and development.
164 (4) Each affected local government must transmit to the
165 commanding officer of the relevant associated installation or
166 range or installations information relating to proposed changes
167 to comprehensive plans, plan amendments, and proposed changes to
168 land development regulations which, if approved, would affect
169 the intensity, density, or use of the land adjacent to or in
170 close proximity to the military installation or range. At the
171 request of the commanding officer, affected local governments
172 must also transmit to the commanding officer copies of
173 applications for development orders requesting a variance or
174 waiver from height or lighting restrictions or noise attenuation
175 reduction requirements within areas defined in the local
Page 7 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1141-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1141 2026
176 government's comprehensive plan as being in a zone of influence
177 of the military installation or range. Each affected local
178 government shall provide the military installation or range
179 control military authority an opportunity to review and comment
180 on the proposed changes.
181 (5) The commanding officer or his or her designee may
182 provide advisory comments to the affected local government on
183 the impact such proposed changes may have on the mission of the
184 military installation or range. Such advisory comments shall be
185 based on appropriate data and analyses provided with the
186 comments and may include:
187 (a) If the installation has an airfield or range, whether
188 such proposed changes will be incompatible with the safety and
189 noise standards contained in the Air Installation Compatible Use
190 Zone (AICUZ) or the Range Air Installation Compatible Use Zone
191 (RAICUZ) adopted by the military installation for that airfield
192 or range.;
193 (b) Whether such changes are incompatible with the
194 Installation Environmental Noise Management Program (IENMP) of
195 the United States Army.;
196 (c) Whether such changes are incompatible with the
197 findings of a Joint Land Use Study (JLUS), a Compatible Use Plan
198 Study, an Acoustic Buffer Zone, an Explosive Safety Quantity
199 Distance (ESQD) arc, a Military Influence Overlay District
200 (MIOD), a Military Influence Planning Area (MIPA), and a
Page 8 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1141-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1141 2026
201 Military Installation Complex Encroachment Management Action
202 Plan (ICEMAP), or a Military Installation Readiness Review
203 (MIRR) for the area if one has been completed.; and
204 (d) Whether the military installation or range's
205 installation's mission will be adversely affected by the
206 proposed actions of the county, or affected local government, or
207 controlling authority.
208
209 The commanding officer's comments, underlying studies, and
210 reports shall be considered by the local government in the same
211 manner as the comments received from other reviewing agencies
212 pursuant to s. 163.3184.
213 (6) The affected local government shall take into
214 consideration any comments and accompanying data and analyses
215 provided by the commanding officer or his or her designee
216 pursuant to subsection (4) as they relate to the strategic
217 mission of the base, public safety, and the economic vitality
218 associated with the base's operations, while also respecting
219 private property rights and not being unduly restrictive on
220 those rights. The affected local government shall forward a copy
221 of any comments regarding comprehensive plan amendments to the
222 state land planning agency.
223 (7) To facilitate the exchange of information provided for
224 in this section, a representative of a military installation or
225 range acting on behalf of all military installations and ranges
Page 9 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1141-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1141 2026
226 within that jurisdiction shall serve ex officio as a nonvoting
227 member of the county's or affected local government's land
228 planning or zoning board. The representative is not required to
229 file a statement of financial interest pursuant to s. 112.3145
230 solely due to his or her service on the county's or affected
231 local government's land planning or zoning board.
232 (8) The commanding officer is encouraged to provide
233 information about any community planning assistance grants that
234 may be available to a county or affected local government
235 through programs such as those of the federal Office of Local
236 Defense Community Cooperation Economic Adjustment as an
237 incentive for communities to participate in a joint planning
238 process that would facilitate the compatibility and resilience
239 of community planning and the activities and mission of the
240 military installation or range.
241 (9) Any state department or local government that
242 administratively approves development projects must coordinate
243 with the state land planning agency before granting such
244 approval if the project is located in a military planning zone
245 of influence, including a military-adopted Air Installation
246 Compatible Use Zone (AICUZ), a Range Air Installation Compatible
247 Use Zone (RAICUZ), an Acoustic Buffer Zone (BZ), an Explosive
248 Safety Quantity Distance (ESQD) arc, a Military Influence
249 Overlay District (MIOD), a Military Influence Area (MIA), or a
250 Military Installation Complex Encroachment Management Action
Page 10 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1141-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1141 2026
251 Plan (ICEMAP) that provides for United States Department of
252 Defense mission assurance; protect the health, safety, and
253 welfare of the public surrounding such installations; and
254 support compatibility with operational, test, training, or other
255 national defense capabilities undertaken by the United States
256 Department of Defense within this state's terrestrial, sea
257 space, or airspace boundaries. Any development project that
258 conflicts with such protections may not be approved unless the
259 state land planning agency issues a written finding of no
260 adverse impact on the affected military installation.
261 Section 3. Part V of chapter 252, Florida Statutes,
262 consisting of ss. 252.951-252.958, is created and entitled
263 "Military Community Resiliency."
264 Section 4. Section 252.951, Florida Statutes, is created
265 to read:
266 252.951 Legislative findings and intent.—
267 (1) The Legislature finds that:
268 (a) Florida hosts critical military installations and
269 range complexes that substantially contribute to this state's
270 economy and national defense.
271 (b) These installations depend upon community-based
272 infrastructure, utilities, transportation, housing, and services
273 located outside installation boundaries.
274 (c) When such off-installation assets are vulnerable to
275 natural hazards or other risks, mission assurance and community
Page 11 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1141-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1141 2026
276 resilience are adversely affected.
277 (d) The United States Department of Defense sponsors
278 Military Installation Readiness Reviews (MIRRs) to identify off-
279 installation vulnerabilities and to develop community projects
280 that enhance mission assurance and public resilience.
281 (e) Prioritizing MIRR-validated projects within state
282 resilience grant programs provides co-benefits to communities,
283 safeguards military operations, and supports this state's
284 economy.
285 (2) It is the intent of the Legislature to:
286 (a) Prioritize resilience projects identified and
287 validated in completed MIRRs within existing state resilience
288 grant programs.
289 (b) Protect public interests and the economic benefits
290 associated with prudent resilience investments.
291 (c) Preserve the contributions and value of military
292 installations and ranges in this state.
293 Section 5. Section 252.952, Florida Statutes, is created
294 to read:
295 252.952 Definitions.—As used in this part, the term:
296 (1) "Adverse impact" means an impact likely to impair,
297 restrict, or degrade the operation, training, research,
298 development, or testing activities of a military installation or
299 range.
300 (2) "Department" means a state department or agency that
Page 12 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1141-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1141 2026
301 administers a resilience-related grant or financial assistance
302 program.
303 (3) "Military installation" has the same meaning as in s.
304 163.3175(2).
305 (4) "Military Installation Readiness Review" or "MIRR"
306 means a study sponsored by the Department of Defense that
307 assesses community-based risks and vulnerabilities that may
308 adversely affect installation missions and identifies projects
309 to enhance resilience.
310 (5) "Resilience project" means an initiative identified
311 and validated in a MIRR report that addresses vulnerabilities in
312 physical, environmental, or operational infrastructure in the
313 surrounding community.
314 Section 6. Section 252.953, Florida Statutes, is created
315 to read:
316 252.953 Prioritized scoring adjustment.—Subject to
317 appropriation, each department shall, within the existing
318 application scoring frameworks of its resilience-related grant
319 programs, apply a scoring adjustment that prioritizes
320 applications for resilience projects identified and validated in
321 a completed MIRR.
322 Section 7. Section 252.954, Florida Statutes, is created
323 to read:
324 252.954 Considerations.—In applying the prioritized
325 scoring adjustment, a department shall consider:
Page 13 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1141-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1141 2026
326 (1) The strategic importance of the affected installation
327 or range to this state's economy and national defense.
328 (2) The degree to which the project directly mitigates
329 vulnerabilities identified in a MIRR.
330 (3) The project's expected contribution to mission
331 assurance and operational continuity.
332 (4) Community co-benefits, including improved public
333 safety, infrastructure reliability, environmental stewardship,
334 and disaster preparedness.
335 Section 8. Section 252.955, Florida Statutes, is created
336 to read:
337 252.955 Transparency.—By October 1, 2026, each department
338 shall publish a revised prioritized scoring adjustment on its
339 website and in related program materials.
340 Section 9. Section 252.956, Florida Statutes, is created
341 to read:
342 252.956 Oversight and reporting.—
343 (1) The Division of Emergency Management shall coordinate
344 interagency implementation of this part.
345 (2) By December 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the
346 division shall submit a report to the Governor, the Speaker of
347 the House of Representatives, and the President of the Senate
348 that summarizes:
349 (a) Programs updated to incorporate the prioritized
350 scoring adjustment required by this part.
Page 14 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1141-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1141 2026
351 (b) Applications and awards for MIRR-validated projects.
352 (c) Observed outcomes and recommended improvements.
353 Section 10. Section 252.957, Florida Statutes, is created
354 to read:
355 252.957 Stakeholder coordination.—A department shall, as
356 appropriate, coordinate with the United States Department of
357 Defense, the Federal Emergency Management Agency, regional
358 planning councils, local governments, utilities, and private-
359 sector stakeholders to facilitate implementation of this part.
360 Section 11. Section 252.958, Florida Statutes, is created
361 to read:
362 252.958 Rulemaking.—A department may adopt rules to
363 implement this part.
364 Section 12. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 15 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1141-00